Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.260

Private construction performed pursuant to contract for rental, lease, or purchase by state—Must comply with prevailing wage law.

Any work, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement, other than ordinary maintenance, that the state or a municipality causes to be performed by a private party through a contract to rent, lease, or purchase at least fifty percent of the project by one or more state agencies or municipalities shall comply with chapter 39.12 RCW.

[ 1993 c 110 s 1.]

NOTES:

Application—1993 c 110: "Section 1 of this act shall not apply to any project for which a call for competitive bids was made before July 25, 1993." [ 1993 c 110 s 2.]